Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-824
Department; gasohol; use; conditions.

The department shall be required to comply with sections 66-821 to 66-824 only to the extent that gasohol supplies are available. The department shall purchase gasohol for use in its motor vehicles only if, and to the extent that, the cost of the gasohol does not exceed the cost of the fuel otherwise used in such vehicle by more than ten percent.

Laws 1979, LB 74, § 4.